Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Alaska Fire Standards Council.

Sec. 18.70.310.
Hazardous chemicals, materials, and wastes placards. [Repealed, § 15 ch 71 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 18.70.320.
Policy.

It is the policy of the state to protect its residents and their property from the ravages of fire. The state recognizes the need for the state to participate in providing an educational and training system that meets the needs of all communities and all fire services personnel. The legislature finds that fire is a constant threat and that homes, places of employment, modes of transportation, and our natural resources need a system of fire protection that is based on the most current, practical standards and educational principles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)

Sec. 18.70.330.
Creation.

There is created in the Department of Public Safety the Alaska Fire Standards Council.

The council consists of the following persons:

Two chief administrative officers or fire chiefs; only one person appointed under this paragraph may be from a fire department that consists entirely of paid employees;

the state fire marshal or a designee of the state fire marshal;

four representatives of firefighters, including at least one member of the Alaska State Firefighters Association nominated under (c) of this section and at least one member of the Alaska Professional Fire Fighters Association nominated under (c) of this section; a person appointed under this paragraph may not, while serving on the council, be a fire chief;

two volunteer firefighters, one from a community with a population of 2,500 or less and one from a community with a population greater than 2,500;

two members of the public at large with at least one member from a community with a population of 2,500 or less;

one member of the Alaska Fire Chiefs Association nominated under (c) of this section.

The governor shall appoint members of each association named in (b) of this section from a list of at least three nominees submitted by each association. The governor may reject a list submitted under this subsection and request that another list be submitted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 32 SLA 2013)

Sec. 18.70.340.
Appointment; meetings; expenses.

The state fire marshal or a designee shall serve on the council during each state fire marshal’s continuance in office. Other members of the council shall be appointed by the governor for staggered terms of four years, except that a member may not serve beyond the time the member holds the office that established eligibility for appointment. Membership on the council does not disqualify a member from holding another public office or employment. The council shall select its chair and vice-chair annually.

The council shall meet at least twice a year. The chair shall set the time and place of the meeting, either on the chair’s own motion or on written request by three members of the council. The council is encouraged to meet electronically.

The members of the council do not receive a salary for service on the council, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For initial appointments to the council, see § 2, ch. 101, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.70.350.
Powers.

The council may

adopt regulations for the administration of AS

18.70.320

—

18.70.369

, including regulations

establishing minimum training and performance standards for certification of fire services personnel that are consistent with the standards of the National Fire Protection Association or other applicable standards;

establishing minimum fire training curriculum requirements for certification of training programs that are designed to enable trainees to meet the standards established under (A) of this paragraph;

governing the procedure for certification of fire services training programs that meet the minimum curriculum requirements adopted under this section;

governing the procedure for certification of individuals who satisfy the minimum training and performance standards established under this section; and

governing the procedure for revocation of the certificate of a person or program that, having been issued a certificate under this section, fails at a later date to meet the standards adopted by the council under this section; the procedures must be consistent with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act);

consult and cooperate with municipalities, agencies of the state, other governmental agencies, universities, colleges, and other institutions concerning the development of fire services training schools and programs offered in the state;

employ an administrator and other persons necessary to carry out its duties; and

charge and collect fees determined by the council to be necessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)

Sec. 18.70.355.
Certification optional.

Nothing in AS

18.70.320

—

18.70.369

may be construed to prohibit a person from performing fire services without a certificate issued by the council. However, an entity for whom a person performs fire services as an employee or volunteer may require that the person be certified by the council or attend training programs that are certified by the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)

Sec. 18.70.360.
Alaska fire services personnel fund.

The Alaska fire services personnel fund is created in the general fund. The fund consists of appropriations made by the legislature to the fund. The council may use the money in the fund to carry out its powers and duties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)

Sec. 18.70.369.
Definitions.

In AS

18.70.320

—

18.70.369

,

“council” means the Alaska Fire Standards Council established under AS

18.70.330

;

“fire services” means fire prevention services, fire suppression services, fire suppression support services, or training or educational services related to fire prevention or fire suppression that are performed by an employee of or volunteer with an organized fire service;

“organized fire service” means a group of persons organized and trained for prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire, except that the term does not include groups of persons regulated under AS 18.65 or persons regulated under AS 18.08 who are performing within the scope of their certificates acquired under those chapters.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1998)